Wisconsin, session 2025, SB741.
do enact as follows:SB741,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table - See PDF for table SB741,26Section 2. 20.115 (3) (e) of the statutes is created to read:SB741,2,8720.115 (3) (e) Food waste reduction grants. The amounts in the schedule for 8providing food waste reduction grants under s. 93.53.SB741,39Section 3. 93.53 of the statutes is created to read:SB741,2,161093.53 Food waste reduction grants. (1) The department shall provide 11grants for food waste reduction pilot projects that have an objective of preventing 12food waste, redirecting surplus food to hunger relief organizations, and composting 13food waste. In awarding grants under this section, the department shall give 14preference to proposals that serve census tracts for which the median household 15income is below the statewide median household income and in which no grocery 16store is located.SB741,2,1817(2) The department shall promulgate rules for the administration of this 18section.SB741,2,1919